California statutes. Penal Code
(2) The board shall require any person who applies for certification under this section to submit information relevant to the applicant’s fitness to provide sex offender management services. Any person who knowingly provides false information under this paragraph shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount up to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500), in addition to any other remedies available to the board. An
 action for a civil penalty under this provision may be brought by any public prosecutor in the name of the people of the State of California.

(3) The board shall assess a fee to the applicant not to exceed one hundred eighty dollars ($180) per application. The board shall pay a fee to the Department of Justice sufficient to cover the cost of processing the criminal background request specified in this section.

(b) On or before July 1, 2011, the board shall develop and update standards for certification of sex offender management programs, which shall include treatment, as specified, and dynamic and future violence risk assessments pursuant to Section 290.09. The standards shall be published on the board’s Internet Web site. All those programs shall include polygraph examinations by a certified polygraph examiner, which shall be conducted as needed during
 the period that the offender is in the sex offender management program. Only certified sex offender management professionals whose programs meet the standards set by the board are eligible to provide sex offender management programs pursuant to Section 290.09.

(c) Certified sex offender management professionals, who provide sex offender management programs and risk assessments pursuant to Section 290.09, shall not be held civilly liable for any criminal acts committed by the persons on parole, probation, or judicial commitment status who receive supervision or treatment. This waiver of liability shall apply to certified sex offender management professionals, administrators of the programs provided by those professionals, and to agencies or persons under contract to those professionals who provide screening, clinical evaluation, risk assessment, supervision, or treatment to sex offender parolees, probationers, or persons on conditional release
 pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 6600) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 6 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) On or before July 1, 2011, the board shall develop and update standards for certification of polygraph examiners. The standards shall be published on the board’s Internet Web site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 357, Sec. 7.   (AB 813)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 9.5. PRIVATELY OWNED AND OPERATED DETENTION FACILITIES [9500. - 9506.]

9500.

As used in this title, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Detention facility” means any facility in which persons are incarcerated or otherwise involuntarily confined for purposes of execution of a punitive sentence imposed by a court or detention pending a trial, hearing, or other judicial or administrative proceeding.

(b) “Private detention facility” means a detention facility that is operated by a private, nongovernmental, for-profit entity, and operating pursuant to a contract or agreement with a governmental entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 739, Sec. 2.   (AB 32)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9501.

Except as otherwise provided in this title, a person shall not operate a private detention facility within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 739, Sec. 2.   (AB 32)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9502.

Section 9501 shall not apply to any of the following:

(a) Any facility providing rehabilitative, counseling, treatment, mental health, educational, or medical services to a juvenile that is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Division 2 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) Any facility providing evaluation or treatment services to a person who has been detained, or is subject to an order of commitment by a court, pursuant to Section 1026, or pursuant to Division 5 (commencing with Section 5000) or Division 6 (commencing with Section 6000) of the Welfare and
 Institutions Code.

(c) Any facility providing educational, vocational, medical, or other ancillary services to an inmate in the custody of, and under the direct supervision of, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or a county sheriff or other law enforcement agency.

(d) A residential care facility licensed pursuant to Division 2 (commencing with Section 1200) of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) Any school facility used for the disciplinary detention of a pupil.

(f) Any facility used for the quarantine or isolation of persons for public health reasons pursuant to Division 105 (commencing with Section 120100) of the Health and Safety Code.

(g) Any facility used for the temporary detention of a person detained or arrested by a merchant, private security guard, or other private person pursuant to Section 490.5 or 837.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 739, Sec. 2.   (AB 32)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9503.

Section 9501 does not apply to any privately owned property or facility that is leased and operated by the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation or a county sheriff or other law enforcement agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 739, Sec. 2.   (AB 32)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9505.

Section 9501 does not apply to either of the following:

(a) A private detention facility that is operating pursuant to a valid contract with a governmental entity that was in effect before January 1, 2020, for the duration of that contract, not to include any extensions made to or authorized by that contract.

(b) A private detention facility contract renewed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 5003.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 739, Sec. 2.   (AB 32)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

9506.

(a) A private detention facility responsible for the custody and control of a prisoner or a civil detainee shall comply with all of the following requirements: 

(1) The private detention facility shall comply with all appropriate state and local building, zoning, health, safety, and fire statutes, ordinances, and regulations, and with the minimum jail standards established by regulations adopted by the Board of State and Community Corrections, as set forth in Subchapter 4 (commencing with Section 1000) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The private detention
 facility shall select and train its personnel in accordance with selection and training requirements adopted by the Board of State and Community Corrections as set forth in Subchapter 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Chapter 1 of Division 1 of Title 15 of the California Code of Regulations.

(3) The private detention facility shall maintain the following insurance coverages, which shall be obtained from an admitted insurer:

(A) General liability, including directors’ and officers’ liability, medical professional liability, and liability for civil rights violations, with minimum coverage limits of not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) per occurrence and twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in aggregate. The policy shall require the private detention facility to comply with the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) and this paragraph, and to provide the insurer and Insurance Commissioner with an initial compliance report and subsequent annual compliance updates.

(B) Automobile liability, with minimum coverage limits of not less than five million dollars ($5,000,000) per occurrence. The policy shall require the private detention facility to comply with the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) and this paragraph, and to provide the insurer and Insurance Commissioner with an initial compliance report and subsequent annual compliance updates.

(C) Umbrella liability, with minimum coverage limits of not less than twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) per occurrence and twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) in aggregate. The policy shall require the private detention facility to comply with the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) and this paragraph, and to provide the insurer and Insurance Commissioner with an initial compliance report and subsequent annual compliance updates.

(D) Workers’ compensation as required by law. Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 3700 of the Labor Code, self-insurance does not satisfy this requirement. The policy shall require the private detention facility to comply with the requirements of paragraphs (1) and (2) and this paragraph, and to provide the insurer and Insurance Commissioner with an initial compliance report and subsequent annual compliance updates.

(b) (1) This section shall not apply to facilities identified in Section 9502.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), this section shall apply to a private detention facility that provides vocational, medical, or other ancillary services to an inmate, and wherein inmates are regularly confined for time periods greater than 10 consecutive hours. 

(c) This section shall not create any additional authority or responsibility on the part of the Board of State and Community Corrections or Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The Board of State and Community Corrections and Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall neither be required, nor are authorized
 to, expend any funds, or incur any expenses as a result of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 298, Sec. 2.   (SB 334)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 10. GENERAL PROVISIONS [10000. - 10008.]

10000.

The provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 2000), insofar as they are substantially the same as existing provisions relating to the same subject matter, shall be construed as restatements and continuations thereof and not as new enactments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 167.)
-------------------------------------------

10001.

All persons who, at the time this act goes into effect, hold office under any of the acts repealed by this act, which offices are continued by this act, continue to hold the same according to the former tenure thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

10002.

No action or proceeding commenced before this act takes effect, and no right accrued, is affected by the provisions of this act, but all procedure thereafter taken therein shall conform to the provisions of this act so far as possible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

10003.

If any portion of Part 3 (commencing with Section 2000) is held unconstitutional, that decision shall not affect the validity of any other portion of Part 3 (commencing with Section 2000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 168.)
-------------------------------------------

10004.

Division, chapter, article, and section headings contained herein shall not be deemed to govern, limit, modify or in any manner affect the scope, meaning or intent of the provisions of any division, chapter, article or section hereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

10005.

Whenever, by the provisions of this act, a power is granted to a public officer or a duty imposed upon such an officer, the power may be exercised or the duty performed by a deputy of the officer or by a person authorized pursuant to law by the officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

10006.

(a) The Department of the Youth Authority and local juvenile halls and camps are prohibited from allowing a minor detained in any institution or facility under their respective jurisdiction to view a videotape or movie shown by the institution or facility that contains harmful matter, as specified in Chapter 7.6 (commencing with Section 313) of Title 9 of Part 1.

(b) The Department of Corrections, the Department of the Youth Authority, county juvenile halls and camps, and local adult detention facilities may promulgate regulations regarding the showing of videotapes and movies at any institution or facility under their respective jurisdiction in order to provide for the reasonable security of the institution or facility in which a minor or adult is confined and for the reasonable protection of the public consistent with Section 2600.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 323, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

10007.

The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may use portable or temporary buildings to provide rehabilitation, treatment, and educational services to inmates within its custody, or to house inmates, as long as that housing does not jeopardize inmate or staff safety.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 7, Sec. 23.   Effective May 3, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

10008.

(a) When a person, including a juvenile, who is in custody dies, the agency with jurisdiction over the state or local correctional facility with custodial responsibility for the person at the time of their death shall, consistent with reporting requirements pursuant to Section 12525 of the Government Code, post all of the following on its internet website:

(1) The full name of the agency with custodial responsibility at the time of death.

(2) The county in which the death occurred.

(3) The facility in which the death occurred, and the location within that facility where the death occurred.

(4) The race, gender, and age of the decedent.

(5) The date on which the death occurred.

(6) The custodial status of the decedent, including, but not limited to, whether the person was awaiting arraignment, awaiting trial, or incarcerated.

(7) The manner and means of death.

(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the information shall be posted for the public to view on the agency’s internet website within 10 days of the date of death. If any of the information changes, including, but not limited to, the manner and means of death and the date on which the death occurred, once determined by a medical examiner or similar entity, the agency shall update the posting within 30 days of
 the change.

(2) If the agency seeks to notify the next of kin and is unable to notify them within 10 days of the death, the agency shall be given an additional 10 days to make good faith efforts to notify next of kin before the information shall be posted for the public to view on the agency’s internet website.

(c) “In-custody death” means the death of a person who is detained, under arrest, or is in the process of being arrested, is en route to be incarcerated, or is incarcerated at a municipal or county jail, state prison, state-run boot camp prison, boot camp prison that is contracted out by the state, any state or local contract facility, or other local or state correctional facility, including any juvenile facility. “In-custody death” also includes deaths that occur in medical facilities while in law-enforcement custody.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 968, Sec. 1.   (AB 2531)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

PART 4. PREVENTION OF CRIMES AND APPREHENSION OF CRIMINALS [11006. - 14315.]



TITLE 1. INVESTIGATION AND CONTROL OF CRIMES AND CRIMINALS [11006. - 11482.]



  CHAPTER 1. Investigation, Identification, and Information Responsibilities of the Department of Justice [11006. - 11144.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [11006. - 11010.]

11006.

The Attorney General shall appoint such agents and other employees as he deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

All persons employed after July 1, 1973, within the Department of Justice designated as peace officers and performing investigative duties shall be required by the department to obtain a certificate from the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 557.)
-------------------------------------------

11008.

The Attorney General shall from time to time arrange for and organize schools at convenient centers in the State to train peace officers in their powers and duties and in the use of approved equipment and methods for detection, identification and apprehension of criminals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

11010.

(a) The Department of Justice shall adopt standards and guidelines regarding the handling of potential evidence arising out of the testing of substances that are suspected to be related to activities of terrorists, to be used by laboratories operated by or contracting with the Department of Justice, any state agency, or any local agency, and by any other laboratory in the state the department determines may test any material that may become evidence in a criminal prosecution for any crime committed in the commission of terrorist activities.

(b) The standards and guidelines adopted pursuant to this section shall include information on issues that may arise in the chain of custody and the employment of controls that are suitable for preserving evidence for use in the prosecution of a crime.

(c) In developing the standards for adoption pursuant to this section, the Department of Justice shall consult with appropriate laboratories of public agencies used by law enforcement agencies, law enforcement agencies, and the State Department of Health Services.

(d) The Department of Justice shall make the guidelines and standards adopted pursuant to this section available to the appropriate laboratories specified in subdivision (a).

(e) The provisions of this section shall be accomplished to the extent that funds are available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 125, Sec. 1.   Effective July 9, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Criminal Investigation [11050. - 11055.]

11050.

In any crime of statewide importance, the Attorney General may, upon the request of any district attorney, sheriff or chief of police, assign to such officer so requesting, an investigator or investigators for the investigation or detection of crimes, and the apprehension or prosecution of criminals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1377.)
-------------------------------------------

11050.5.

(a) The Attorney General may, upon the request of any district attorney, sheriff, chief of police, or other local, state or federal law enforcement official, make available to such official so requesting, the department’s laboratory facilities and personnel and the department’s technical experts, including but not limited to such personnel as fingerprint examiners, criminalists, document examiners and intelligence specialists for the purpose of assisting in the investigation of criminal matters, the detection of crimes and the apprehension or prosecution of criminals.

(b) The Attorney General may, upon the request of any public defender or private defense counsel appointed by the court, make available to such public defender or such private appointed counsel, the department’s laboratory facilities and personnel and the department’s technical experts, including but not limited to such personnel as fingerprint examiners, criminalists, document examiners and intelligence specialists for the purpose of assisting in the representation by such public defender or private appointed counsel of persons in criminal proceedings. The Attorney General may contract with each county whose public defender or such private appointed counsel makes requests pursuant to this subdivision for the payment of the reasonable costs of time and material in making available information, services or facilities pursuant to this subdivision. No information, services or facilities shall be made available to such public defender or private appointed counsel unless the county so contracts with the Attorney General.

(c) A copy of any information, including the results of any analysis, furnished by the Attorney General to a public defender, or private defense counsel appointed by the court, pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be sent to the district attorney of the county in which the public defender is located. If this subdivision or its application to any person or circumstance is invalid, subdivision (b) shall not be operative.

(d) The Department of Justice may charge a fee for the laboratory services it performs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1135.)
-------------------------------------------

11051.

The Department of Justice shall perform duties in the investigation, detection, apprehension, prosecution or suppression of crimes as may be assigned by the Attorney General in the performance of his or her duties under Article V, Section 13 of the Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 787, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11052.

For the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the investigators shall have all the powers conferred by law upon any peace officer of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

11053.

After the effective date of this chapter, and thereafter until the Governor finds and proclaims that an emergency no longer exists in preparing for the national defense, or whenever the United States is engaged in war, or whenever a war emergency has been declared to exist by the President of the United States, the Attorney General may appoint for the duration of the war or emergency, as the case may be, such additional special criminal investigators not to exceed nine in number as he deems necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. There shall not be more than 15 such investigators employed at any one time. The employment of such investigators shall terminate not later than 90 days after the conclusion of peace or the official termination of the emergency by the President or the Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

11054.

No investigation of the acts or conduct of any state agency or state official shall be initiated or made through or by the bureau or any employee thereof, without the authorization of the Attorney General particularly specifying the office, department or person to be investigated and the scope and purposes of the investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

11055.

(a) There is within the Department of Justice the Foreign Prosecution and Law Enforcement Unit designated with the responsibility for assisting local law enforcement agencies with foreign prosecutions, child abduction recoveries and returns under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction, and law enforcement investigative matters. The unit is also responsible for assisting local law enforcement in obtaining information from foreign officials on foreign prosecution matters.

(b) The Foreign Prosecution and Law Enforcement Unit shall do all of the following:

(1) For those countries having extraterritorial jurisdiction allowing for the prosecution of their citizens for crimes committed in California, the unit shall, upon request, provide informational assistance to local law enforcement on foreign prosecution protocols and provide technical assistance in preparing investigative materials for forwarding and filing in international jurisdictions. The unit shall provide information and assistance on the scope and uses of foreign prosecution to California prosecutors and law enforcement agencies. The unit shall be responsible for tracking foreign prosecution cases presented by California law enforcement agencies. The unit shall collect information on a statewide basis regarding foreign prosecution cases for the primary purpose of analyzing the information it collects and disseminating its conclusions to local law enforcement agencies. Local law enforcement agencies shall retain the authority to prepare and present foreign prosecution cases without the assistance of the unit.

(2) The unit shall assist district attorneys in recovering children from Mexico, and, where appropriate, other countries either in court-ordered returns pursuant to the Hague Convention or voluntary returns.

(3) The unit shall, upon request, assist local law enforcement agencies and foreign law enforcement in formal requests under the Mutual Legal Assistance Treaty. The unit shall, upon request, also assist California law enforcement agencies and foreign officials in informal requests for mutual legal assistance.

(4) The unit, under the direction of the Attorney General, shall provide information to local law enforcement on sensitive diplomatic issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 151.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.3. California Criminalistics Institute [11060. - 11062.]

11060.

There is hereby established in the Bureau of Forensic Services of the Department of Justice the California Criminalistics Institute.

The purposes of the institute shall include, but need not be limited to, the facilitation of a comprehensive and coordinated approach to meet the high technology forensic science needs of crime laboratories operated by the department and local law enforcement agencies, the provision of a statewide upgrading of advanced laboratory services incorporating new and developing technologies, the provision of training and methodology development for all law enforcement agencies, and the handling of advanced casework laboratory referral services.

The California Criminalistics Institute is intended for use by state and local forensic scientists and law enforcement personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 56, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

11061.

To meet the increasing statewide need for criminalists properly trained in DNA analysis, the Department of Justice, the California State University, and, upon agreement by the regents, the University of California, shall work together to enhance collaborative opportunities for DNA training of university students, graduates, and existing employees of crime laboratories.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 477, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11061.5.

(a) The Department of Justice, through its California Criminalistics Institute, shall develop and coordinate an internship program in forensic DNA analysis for graduate-level students.

(1) Candidates for the program must possess at least a baccalaureate degree.

(2) The program shall be associated with graduate academic programs at accredited postsecondary institutions including the University of California and the California State University.

(3) The program shall include a one-year internship at a public forensic DNA laboratory for which the interns shall receive a stipend or fellowship funded by the Department of Justice.

(4) The program shall be designed to prepare students to meet national standards for DNA analysis, such as those established by the DNA Advisory Board (DAB) and the Scientific Working Group on DNA Analysis Methods (SWGDAM).

(5) In order to complete the program, interns shall be required to successfully complete a national certification examination like that administered in forensic molecular biology by the American Board of Criminalistics.

(b) Funding for the provisions of this measure shall be subject to both of the following conditions:

(1) The Department of Justice shall establish a working partnership and affiliation with accredited postsecondary institutions that can provide graduate-level academic programing.

(2) The Department of Justice shall submit a budgetary request for the internship program to the Director of the Department of Finance by May 15, 2002.

(c) The provisions of this act may only be implemented to the extent funds are appropriated for their purposes in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 477, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

11062.

(a) The Department of Justice shall establish and chair a task force to conduct a review of California’s crime laboratory system.

(b) The task force shall be known as the “Crime Laboratory Review Task Force.” The composition of the task force shall, except as specified in paragraph (16), be comprised of one representative of each of the following entities:

(1) The Department of Justice.

(2) The California Association of Crime Laboratory Directors.

(3) The California Association of Criminalists.

(4) The International Association for Identification.

(5) The American Society of Crime Laboratory Directors.

(6) The Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(7) The California State Sheriffs’ Association, from a department with a crime laboratory.

(8) The California District Attorneys Association, from an office with a crime laboratory.

(9) The California Police Chiefs Association, from a department with a crime laboratory.

(10) The California Peace Officers’ Association.

(11) The California Public Defenders Association.

(12) A private criminal defense attorney organization.

(13) The Judicial Council, to be appointed by the Chief Justice.

(14) The Office of the Speaker of the Assembly.

(15) The Office of the President pro Tempore of the Senate.

(16) Two representatives to be appointed by the Governor.

(c) The task force shall review and make recommendations as to how best to configure, fund, and improve the delivery of state and local crime laboratory services in the future. To the extent feasible, the review and recommendations shall include, but are not limited to, addressing the following issues:

(1) With respect to organization and management of crime laboratory services, consideration of the following:

(A) If the existing mix of state and local crime laboratories is the most effective and efficient means to meet California’s future needs.

(B) Whether laboratories should be further consolidated. If consolidation occurs, who should have oversight of crime laboratories.

(C) If management responsibilities for some laboratories should be transferred.

(D) Whether all laboratories should provide similar services.

(E) How other states have addressed similar issues.

(2) With respect to staff and training, consideration of the following:

(A) How to address recruiting and retention problems of laboratory staff.

(B) Whether educational and training opportunities are adequate to supply the needs of fully trained forensic criminalists in the future.

(C) Whether continuing education is available to ensure that forensic science personnel are up-to-date in their fields of expertise.

(D) If crime laboratory personnel should be certified, and, if so, the appropriate agency to assume this responsibility.

(E) The future educational role, if any, for the University of California or the California State University.

(3) With respect to funding, consideration of the following:

(A) Whether the current method of funding laboratories is predictable, stable, and adequate to meet future growth demands and to provide accurate and timely testing results.

(B) The adequacy of salary structures to attract and retain competent analysts and examiners.

(4) With respect to performance standards and equipment, consideration of the following:

(A) Whether workload demands are being prioritized properly and whether there are important workload issues not being addressed.

(B) If existing laboratories have the necessary capabilities, staffing, and equipment.

(C) If statewide standards should be developed for the accreditation of forensic laboratories, including minimum staffing levels, and if so, a determination regarding what entity should serve as the sanctioning body.

(d) The task force also shall seek input from specialized law enforcement disciplines, other state and local agencies, relevant advocacy groups, and the public. The final report also shall include a complete inventory of existing California crime laboratories. This inventory shall contain sufficient details on staffing, workload, budget, major instrumentation, and organizational placement within the controlling agency.

(e) The first meeting of the task force shall occur no later than December 9, 2007.

(f) On or before July 1, 2009, the task force shall submit a final report of its findings to the Department of Finance and to the budget and public safety committees of both houses of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 179, Sec. 182.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.4. Tribal Assistance Program [11070. - 11070.]

11070.

(a) To improve upon the implementation of concurrent criminal jurisdiction on California Indian lands, the Department of Justice shall, subject to an appropriation by the Legislature, in a manner to be prescribed by the department, provide technical assistance to local law enforcement agencies that have Indian lands within or abutting their jurisdictions, and to tribal governments with Indian lands, including those with and without tribal law enforcement agencies, to include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Providing guidance for law enforcement education and training on policing and criminal investigations on Indian lands that supports consistent implementation of California’s responsibilities for enforcing statewide
 criminal laws on Indian lands that protect the health, safety, and welfare of tribal citizens on Indian lands.

(2) Providing guidance on improving crime reporting, crime statistics, criminal procedures, and investigative tools for conducting police investigations of statewide criminal laws on Indian lands.

(3) Providing educational materials about the complexities of concurrent criminal jurisdiction with tribal governments and their tribal law enforcement agencies, specifically to tribal citizens on Indian lands, including information on how to report a crime, and information relating to victim’s rights and victim services in California.

(4) Facilitating and supporting improved communication between local law enforcement agencies and tribal governments or tribal law enforcement agencies for purposes of consistent
 implementation of concurrent criminal jurisdiction on California Indian lands.

(b) (1) To address the issues involving missing and murdered Native Americans in California, particularly missing and murdered Native American women and girls, the department shall, subject to an appropriation by the Legislature, in a manner to be prescribed by the department, conduct a study to determine how to increase state criminal justice protective and investigative resources for reporting and identifying missing Native Americans in California, particularly women and girls. The study shall include all of the following:

(A) A determination of the scope of the issue of missing and murdered Native Americans in California, particularly women and girls.

(B) Identification of barriers in reporting or investigating
 missing Native Americans in California, particularly women and girls.

(C) Ways to create partnerships to increase cross-reporting and investigation of missing Native Americans in California, particularly women and girls, between federal, state, local, and tribal governments, including tribal governments without tribal law enforcement agencies.

(2) As part of the study, the department shall conduct outreach to tribal governments in California, Native American communities, local, tribal, state, and federal law enforcement agencies, and state and tribal courts.

(3) The department shall submit a report to the Legislature upon completion of the study. The report shall include all of the following:

(A) Data and analysis of the number of missing Native
 Americans in California, particularly women and girls. 

(B) Identification of the barriers to providing state resources to address the issue.

(C) Recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to improve the reporting and identification of missing Native Americans in California, particularly women and girls.

(c) (1) The requirement for submitting a report imposed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) is inoperative on January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 170, Sec. 2.   (AB 3099)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.45. Tribal Police Pilot Program [11073. - 11073.6.]

11073.

(a) The Tribal Police Pilot Program is hereby established to operate from July 1, 2026, until July 1, 2029, under the direction of the Department of Justice and the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(b) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of law, any qualified entity may notify the department that they wish to enroll in the pilot program and, upon verification by the department, in coordination with the commission, that the entity has complied with the requirements prescribed in subdivision (d), any qualified member of that entity shall be deemed a peace officer as provided in Section 830.83.

(c) (1) A person shall not be a qualified
 member unless the person completes and maintains all applicable requirements for the appointment, training, education, hiring, eligibility, and certification required for peace officers under state law, including, without limitation, those described in Sections 832 and 832.55 and any regulations adopted thereunder.

(2) A qualified member is subject to the requirements of Sections 13500 to 13519.15, inclusive, of this code, Sections 1029, 1030, 1031, and 1031.4 of the Government Code, and any regulations adopted thereto.

(3) A qualified entity designating a person as a peace officer pursuant to this program shall document that person’s compliance with this subdivision and Section 832.55 and submit that documentation to the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.

(d) A qualified entity enrolled in this
 pilot program shall do all of the following:

(1) Enact and maintain in continuous force a tribal law or resolution expressing their intent that tribal officers participating in this pilot program be California peace officers, and that the qualified entity be similarly situated to a California local law enforcement agency employing California peace officers, and adopting any requirements prescribed by this section and Sections 830.83 and 832.55.

(2) Adopt and maintain in continuous force for a period of no less than three years after the conclusion of the pilot program, tribal law that provides public access to records, and related procedures and remedies substantively identical to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) as to any record related to this pilot program. Such records include, without